Arkansas, session 2025, SB377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Grocery Tax Relief
Act".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly intends:
(1) To exempt the gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from
the sale of food and food ingredients from state taxes; and
(2) For the gross receipts and gross proceeds derived from the
sale of food and food ingredients to continue to be subject to taxes levied
*JLL272*
03/05/2025 9:20:35 AM JLL272

SB377
by municipalities and counties under the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941,
§ 26-52-101 et seq., and the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-
101 et seq.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1103(b), concerning the Property Tax
Relief Trust Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The fund shall consist of such revenues as generated by §§ 26-52-
302(c), 26-52-317(c)(1)(B), 26-52-319(a)(2)(B), 26-53-107(c), 26-53-
145(c)(1)(B), 26-53-148(a)(2)(B), and 26-56-224(c)(2) and shall be used for
such purposes as set out in § 26-26-310.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1227(b)(3), concerning the Educational
Adequacy Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The revenues generated by § 26-52-302(d), § 26-52-316,
§ 26-52-317(c)(1)(C), § 26-52-319(a)(2)(C), § 26-53-107(d), § 26-53-
145(c)(1)(C), § 26-53-148(a)(2)(C), § 26-56-224(c)(3), and § 26-57-
1002(d)(1)(A)(ii); and

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 19-6-201(58), concerning the enumeration of
general revenues, is repealed.
(58) Seventy-six and six-tenths percent (76.6%) of all taxes,
interest, penalties, and costs on taxes levied on the gross receipts or gross
proceeds derived from the sale of food and food ingredients, § 26-52-
317(c)(1)(A);

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 19-6-201(60), concerning the enumeration of
general revenues, is repealed.
(60) Seventy-six and six-tenths percent (76.6%) of the taxes,
interest, penalties, and costs received on taxes levied on the privilege of
storing, using, distributing, or using food and food ingredients, § 26-53-
145(c)(1)(A);

SECTION 7. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 26-52-301,
concerning the sales tax levied on the sale of certain products and services,
is amended to read as follows:
Except for food and food ingredients that are taxed under § 26-52-317
03/05/2025 9:20:35 AM JLL272

SB377
and except for used motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers that are taxed
under § 26-52-324, there is levied an excise tax of three percent (3%) upon
the gross proceeds or gross receipts derived from all sales to any person of
the following:

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 26-52-302 is amended to read as follows:
26-52-302. Additional taxes levied.
(a)(1) In addition to the excise tax levied upon the gross proceeds or
gross receipts derived from all sales by this chapter, except for food and
food ingredients that are taxed under § 26-52-317 and except for used motor
vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers that are taxed under § 26-52-324, there
is levied an excise tax of one percent (1%) upon all taxable sales of
property, specified digital products, digital codes, and services subject to
the tax levied in this chapter.
(2) This tax shall be collected, reported, and paid in the same
manner and at the same time as is prescribed by law for the collection,
reporting, and payment of all other Arkansas gross receipts taxes.
(3) In computing gross receipts or gross proceeds as defined in
§ 26-52-103, a deduction shall be allowed for bad debts resulting from the
sale of tangible personal property.
(b)(1) In addition to the excise tax levied upon the gross proceeds or
gross receipts derived from all sales by this chapter, except for food and
food ingredients that are taxed under § 26-52-317 and except for used motor
vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers that are taxed under § 26-52-324, there
is hereby levied an excise tax of one-half of one percent (0.5%) upon all
taxable sales of property, specified digital products, digital codes, and
services subject to the tax levied in this chapter.
(2) This tax shall be collected, reported, and paid in the same
manner and at the same time as is prescribed by law for the collection,
reporting, and payment of all other Arkansas gross receipts taxes.
(3) However, in computing gross receipts or gross proceeds as
defined in § 26-52-103, a deduction shall be allowed for bad debts resulting
from the sale of tangible personal property.
(c)(1) Except for food and food ingredients that are taxed under § 26-
52-317 and except for used motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers that
are taxed under § 26-52-324, there is levied an additional excise tax of one-
03/05/2025 9:20:35 AM JLL272

SB377
half of one percent (0.5%) upon all taxable sales of property, specified
digital products, digital codes, and services subject to the tax levied by
this chapter.
(2) The tax shall be collected, reported, and paid in the same
manner and at the same time as is prescribed by this chapter, for the
collection, reporting, and payment of Arkansas gross receipts taxes.
(d)(1) Except for food and food ingredients that are taxed under § 26-
52-317 and except for used motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers that
are taxed under § 26-52-324, there is levied an additional excise tax of
seven-eighths of one percent (0.875%) upon all taxable sales of property,
specified digital products, digital codes, and services subject to the tax
levied by this chapter.
(2) The tax shall be collected, reported, and paid in the same
manner and at the same time as prescribed by this chapter, for the
collection, reporting, and payment of Arkansas gross receipts taxes.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 26-52-317 is amended to read as follows:
26-52-317. Food and food ingredients.
(a)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall determine the following conditions:
(A) That federal law authorizes the state to collect sales
and use tax from some or all of the sellers that have no physical presence in
the State of Arkansas and that make sales of taxable goods and services to
Arkansas purchasers;
(B) That initiating the collection of sales and use tax
from these sellers would increase the net available general revenues needed
to fund state agencies, services, and programs; and
(C)(i) That during a six-month consecutive period, the
amount of net available general revenues attributable to the collection of
sales and use tax from sellers that have no physical presence in the State of
Arkansas is equal to or greater than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of
sales and use tax collected under subsection (c) of this section and § 26-53-
145 on food and food ingredients.
(ii) The secretary shall make the determination
under subdivision (a)(1)(C)(i) of this section on a monthly basis following
the determination that the conditions under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this
03/05/2025 9:20:35 AM JLL272

SB377
section have been met.
(2)(A) The secretary shall make a monthly determination as to
whether the aggregate amount of deductions from net general revenues
attributable to the following during the most recently ended six-month
consecutive period, as compared with the same six-month period in the prior
year, has declined by thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) or more:
(i) The Educational Adequacy Fund;
(ii) Bonds issued under the Arkansas College Savings
Bond Act of 1989, § 6-62-701 et seq.;
(iii) Bonds issued under the Arkansas Higher
Education Technology and Facility Improvement Act of 2005, § 6-62-1101 et
seq.;
(iv) The City-County Tourist Facilities Aid Fund;
and
(v) Bonds issued under the Arkansas Water, Waste
Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities Financing Act of 1997 and the
Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement Facilities Financing
Act of 2007, § 15-20-1301 et seq.
(B)(i) In making the determination in this subdivision
(a)(2), the secretary shall consider all economic factors existing at the
time of the determination that could potentially affect the decline in the
aggregate amount of deductions, including without limitation pending
litigation.
(ii) If the consideration of additional economic
factors under subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i) of this section results in a
determination that the decline in the aggregate amount of deductions is not
likely to remain at that reduced level, the secretary shall conclude that the
conditions in this subdivision (a)(2) have not been met.
(3) When the secretary finds that all of the conditions in
either subdivision (a)(1) or subdivision (a)(2) of this section have been
met, then the gross receipts or gross proceeds taxes levied under subsection
(c) of this section shall be levied at the rate of zero percent (0%) on the
sale of food and food ingredients beginning on the first day of the calendar
quarter that is at least thirty (30) days following the determination of the
secretary.
(b) As used in this section:
03/05/2025 9:20:35 AM JLL272

SB377
(1) “Food” and “food ingredients” mean the same as defined in §
26-52-103 except that “food” and “food ingredients” do not include prepared
food; and
(2) “Prepared food” means the same as defined in § 26-52-103
except that “prepared food” does not include:
(A) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by
the seller; or
(B) Eggs, fish, meat, and poultry, and foods containing
these raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer to prevent food-
borne illnesses as recommended by the United States Food and Drug
Administration in its 2005 Food Code, § 3-401.11, as it existed on January 1,
2007.
(c)(1) Beginning July 1, 2011, in lieu of the gross receipts or gross
proceeds taxes levied on food and food ingredients under §§ 26-52-301 and 26-
52-302, there is levied a tax on the gross receipts or gross proceeds derived
from the sale of food and food ingredients at the rate of one and three-
eighths percent (1.375%), to be distributed as follows:
(A) Seventy-six and six-tenths percent (76.6%) of the
taxes, interest, penalties, and costs received by the secretary under this
subdivision (c)(1) shall be deposited as general revenues;
(B) Eight and five-tenths percent (8.5%) of the taxes,
interest, penalties, and costs received by the secretary under this
subdivision (c)(1) shall be deposited into the Property Tax Relief Trust
Fund; and
(C) Fourteen and nine-tenths percent (14.9%) of the taxes,
interest, penalties, and costs received by the secretary under this
subdivision (c)(1) shall be deposited into the Educational Adequacy Fund.
(2) The gross receipts or gross proceeds taxes levied under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be collected, reported, and paid in
the same manner and at the same time as is prescribed by law for the
collection, reporting, and payment of all other Arkansas gross receipts
taxes.
(d)(b) The gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale of
food and food ingredients shall continue to be are subject to the:
(1) Excise tax levied under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 75,
§ 2; and
03/05/2025 9:20:35 AM JLL272

SB377
(2) All municipal and county gross receipts taxes.
(e) The Department of Finance and Administration shall promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 26-52-323 is amended to read as follows:
26-52-323. Application of tax to candy and soft drinks.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall
either:
(1)(A) Publish a list of the Universal Product Codes for items
that meet the definition of:
(i) A candy under § 26-52-103 or § 26-53-102; or
(ii) A soft drink under § 26-52-103 or § 26-53-102.
(B) The list published by the secretary under subdivision
(1)(A) of this section shall provide guidance to retailers, sellers, and
vendors regarding which items are defined as a candy or a soft drink but not
defined as food and food ingredients under the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of
1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., or the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949, §
26-53-101 et seq.
(C) The list published by the secretary under subdivision
(1)(A) of this section is exempt from the Arkansas Administrative Procedure
Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.; or
(2) Not subject a retailer, seller, or vendor to the penalties
under § 26-18-201, § 26-18-202, § 26-18-208, § 26-18-209, § 26-52-512, or §
26-53-125 if the retailer, seller, or vendor:
(A) Collects and remits Does not collect or remit tax
payments to the Department of Finance and Administration on the gross
receipts and gross proceeds derived from the sale of items that meet the
definition of:
(i) A candy under § 26-52-103 or § 26-53-102 at the
taxable rate for food and food ingredients under § 26-52-317 or § 26-53-145;
or
(ii) A soft drink under § 26-52-103 or § 26-53-102 at
the taxable rate for food and food ingredients under § 26-52-317 or § 26-53-
145; and
(B) Demonstrates a good faith effort to collect and remit
tax payments to the department on the gross receipts and gross proceeds
03/05/2025 9:20:35 AM JLL272

SB377
derived from the sale of items that meet the definition of:
(i) A candy under § 26-52-103 or § 26-53-102 at the
taxable rate under § 26-52-301, § 26-52-302, § 26-53-106, or § 26-53-107; or
(ii) A soft drink under § 26-52-103 or § 26-53-102 at
the taxable rate under § 26-52-301, § 26-52-302, § 26-53-106, or § 26-53-107.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-457. Food and food ingredients.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Food" and "food ingredients" mean the same as defined in §
26-52-103 except that “food” and “food ingredients” do not include prepared
food; and
(2) “Prepared food” means the same as defined in § 26-52-103
except that “prepared food” does not include:
(A) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by
the seller; or
(B) Eggs, fish, meat, and poultry, and foods containing
these raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer to prevent food-
borne illnesses as recommended by the United States Food and Drug
Administration in its 2005 Food Code, § 3-401.11, as it existed on January 1,
2007.
(b) The gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale of food
and food ingredients are exempt from the gross receipts tax levied by this
chapter and the compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating Tax
Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 26-53-106(a), concerning the imposition
and rate of the compensating use tax, is amended to read as follows:
(a) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person in
this state a tax or excise for the privilege of storing, using, distributing,
or consuming within this state tangible personal property, specified digital
products, a digital code, or a taxable service purchased for storage, use,
distribution, or consumption in this state at the rate of three percent (3%)
of the sales price of the tangible personal property, specified digital
products, digital code, or taxable service except for food and food
03/05/2025 9:20:35 AM JLL272

SB377
ingredients that are taxed under § 26-53-145 and except for used motor
vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers that are taxed under § 26-53-150.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 26-53-107 is amended to read as follows:
26-53-107. Additional taxes levied.
(a)(1) In addition to the excise tax levied upon the privilege of
storing, using, distributing, or consuming tangible personal property,
specified digital products, a digital code, and taxable services within this
state by this subchapter, there is levied an excise tax of one percent (1%)
upon all tangible personal property, specified digital products, digital
codes, and taxable services subject to the tax levied in this subchapter
except for food and food ingredients that are taxed under § 26-53-145 and
except for used motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers that are taxed
under § 26-53-150.
(2) The tax shall be collected, reported, and paid in the same
manner and at the same time as is prescribed by law for the collection,
reporting, and payment of state compensating taxes.
(b)(1) In addition to the excise tax levied upon the privilege of
storing, using, distributing, or consuming tangible personal property,
specified digital products, a digital code, and taxable services within the
state by this subchapter, there is levied an excise tax of one-half of one
percent (0.5%) upon all tangible personal property, specified digital
products, digital codes, and taxable services subject to the tax levied in
this subchapter except for food and food ingredients that are taxed under §
26-53-145 and except for used motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers that
are taxed under § 26-53-150.
(2) The tax shall be collected, reported, and paid in the same
manner and at the same time as is prescribed by law for the collection,
reporting, and payment of Arkansas compensating taxes.
(c)(1) There is levied an additional excise tax of one-half of one
percent (0.5%) upon all tangible personal property, specified digital
products, digital codes, and taxable services subject to the tax levied by
this subchapter except for food and food ingredients that are taxed under §
26-53-145 and except for used motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers that
are taxed under § 26-53-150.
(2) The tax shall be collected, reported, and paid in the same
03/05/2025 9:20:35 AM JLL272

SB377
manner and at the same time as is prescribed by this subchapter for the
collection, reporting, and payment of Arkansas compensating taxes.
(d)(1) There is levied an additional excise tax of seven-eighths of
one percent (0.875%) upon all tangible personal property, specified digital
products, digital codes, and taxable services subject to the tax levied by
this subchapter except for food and food ingredients that are taxed under §
26-53-145 and except for used motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers that
are taxed under § 26-53-150.
(2) The tax shall be collected, reported, and paid in the same
manner and at the same time as is prescribed by this subchapter for the
collection, reporting, and payment of Arkansas compensating taxes.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 26-53-145 is amended to read as follows:
26-53-145. Food and food ingredients.
(a)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall determine the following conditions:
(A) That federal law authorizes the state to collect sales
and use tax from some or all of the sellers that have no physical presence in
the State of Arkansas and that make sales of taxable goods and services to
Arkansas purchasers;
(B) That initiating the collection of sales and use tax
from these sellers would increase the net available general revenues needed
to fund state agencies, services, and programs; and
(C)(i) That during a six-month consecutive period, the
amount of net available general revenues attributable to the collection of
sales and use tax from sellers that have no physical presence in the State of
Arkansas is equal to or greater than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of
sales and use tax collected under subsection (c) of this section and § 26-52-
317 on food and food ingredients.
(ii) The secretary shall make the determination
under subdivision (a)(1)(C)(i) of this section on a monthly basis following
the determination that the conditions under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this
section have been met.
(2)(A) Beginning July 1, 2013, the secretary shall make a
monthly determination as to whether the aggregate amount of deductions from
net general revenues attributable to the following during the most recently
03/05/2025 9:20:35 AM JLL272

SB377
ended six-month consecutive period, as compared with the same six-month
period in the prior year, has declined by thirty-five million dollars
($35,000,000) or more:
(i) The Educational Adequacy Fund;
(ii) Bonds issued under the Arkansas College Savings
Bond Act of 1989, § 6-62-701 et seq.;
(iii) Bonds issued under the Arkansas Higher
Education Technology and Facility Improvement Act of 2005, § 6-62-1101 et
seq.;
(iv) The City-County Tourist Facilities Aid Fund;
and
(v) Bonds issued under the Arkansas Water, Waste
Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities Financing Act of 1997 and the
Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement Facilities Financing
Act of 2007, § 15-20-1301 et seq.
(B)(i) In making the determination in this subdivision
(a)(2), the secretary shall consider all economic factors existing at the
time of the determination that could potentially affect the decline in the
aggregate amount of deductions, including without limitation pending
litigation.
(ii) If the consideration of additional economic
factors under subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i) of this section results in a
determination that the decline in the aggregate amount of deductions is not
likely to remain at that reduced level, the secretary shall conclude that the
conditions in this subdivision (a)(2) have not been met.
(3) When the secretary finds that all of the conditions in
either subdivision (a)(1) or subdivision (a)(2) of this section have been
met, then the compensating use taxes levied under subsection (c) of this
section shall be levied at the rate of zero percent (0%) on the sale of food
and food ingredients beginning on the first day of the calendar quarter that
is at least thirty (30) days following the determination of the secretary.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Food” and “food ingredients” mean the same as defined in §
26-53-102 except that “food” and “food ingredients” do not include prepared
food; and
(2) “Prepared food” means the same as defined in § 26-53-102
03/05/2025 9:20:35 AM JLL272

SB377
except that “prepared food” does not include:
(A) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by
the seller; or
(B) Eggs, fish, meat, and poultry, and foods containing
these raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer to prevent food-
borne illnesses as recommended by the United States Food and Drug
Administration in its 2005 Food Code, § 3-401.11, as it existed on January 1,
2007.
(c)(1) Beginning July 1, 2011, in lieu of the compensating use taxes
levied on food and food ingredients under §§ 26-53-106 and 26-53-107, there
is levied a tax on the privilege of storing, using, distributing, or
consuming food and food ingredients at the rate of one and three-eighths
percent (1.375%) to be distributed as follows:
(A) Seventy-six and six-tenths percent (76.6%) of the
taxes, interest, penalties, and costs received by the secretary under this
subdivision (c)(1) shall be deposited as general revenues;
(B) Eight and five-tenths percent (8.5%) of the taxes,
interest, penalties, and costs received by the secretary under this
subdivision (c)(1) shall be deposited into the Property Tax Relief Trust
Fund; and
(C) Fourteen and nine-tenths percent (14.9%) of the taxes,
interest, penalties, and costs received by the secretary under this
subdivision (c)(1) shall be deposited into the Educational Adequacy Fund.
(2) The use tax levied under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall be collected, reported, and paid in the same manner and at the same
time as is prescribed by law for the collection, reporting, and payment of
all other Arkansas compensating use taxes.
(d) The following shall continue to (b) Municipal and county use
taxes apply to the sales price of food and food ingredients:
(1) The compensating use tax levied under Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 75, § 2; and
(2) All municipal and county use taxes.
(e) The Department of Finance and Administration shall promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section.

SECTION 15. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1-14 of this act are effective
03/05/2025 9:20:35 AM JLL272

SB377
on and after January 1, 2026.



































03/05/2025 9:20:35 AM JLL272